src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.aff
SFX g Y 20
SFX g is is is 
SFX g is i is 
SFX g is ia is 
SFX g is ium is 
SFX g is ibus is 
SFX g 0 que is 
SFX g 0 ne is 
SFX g 0 ve is 
SFX g is ique is 
SFX g is ine is 
SFX g is ive is 
SFX g is iaque is 
SFX g is iane is 
SFX g is iave is 
SFX g is iumque is 
SFX g is iumne is 
SFX g is iumve is 
SFX g is ibusque is 
SFX g is ibusne is 
SFX g is ibusve is 
SFX h Y 56
SFX h us us us 
SFX h us um us 
SFX h us us us 
SFX h us ui us 
SFX h us um us 
SFX h us u us 
SFX h us uum us 
SFX h us ibus us 
SFX h 0 que us 
SFX h 0 ne us 
SFX h 0 ve us 
SFX h us umque us 
SFX h us umne us 
SFX h us umve us 
SFX h us usque us 
SFX h us usne us 
SFX h us usve us 
SFX h us uique us 
SFX h us uine us 
SFX h us uive us 
SFX h us umque us 
SFX h us umne us 
SFX h us umve us 
SFX h us uque us 
SFX h us une us 
SFX h us uve us 
SFX h us uumque us 
SFX h us uumne us 
SFX h us uumve us 
SFX h us ibusque us 
SFX h us ibusne us 
SFX h us ibusve us 
SFX h u u u 
SFX h u us u 
SFX h u ui u 
SFX h u ua u 
SFX h u uum u 
SFX h u ibus u 
SFX h 0 que u 
SFX h 0 ne u 
SFX h 0 ve u 
SFX h u usque u 
SFX h u usne u 
SFX h u usve u 
SFX h u uique u 
SFX h u uine u 
SFX h u uive u 
SFX h u uaque u 
SFX h u uane u 
SFX h u uave u 
SFX h u uumque u 
SFX h u uumne u 
SFX h u uumve u 
SFX h u ibusque u 
SFX h u ibusne u 
SFX h u ibusve u 
SFX i Y 24
SFX i es es es 
SFX i es em es 
SFX i es ei es 
SFX i es e es 
SFX i es erum es 
SFX i es ebus es 
SFX i 0 que es 
SFX i 0 ne es 
SFX i 0 ve es 
SFX i es emque es 
SFX i es emne es 
SFX i es emve es 
SFX i es eique es 
SFX i es eine es 
SFX i es eive es 
SFX i es eque es 
SFX i es ene es 
SFX i es eve es 
SFX i es erumque es 
SFX i es erumne es 
SFX i es erumve es 
SFX i es ebusque es 
SFX i es ebusne es 
SFX i es ebusve es 
SFX j Y 87
SFX j as as as 
SFX j as a as 
SFX j as an as 
SFX j as ae as 
SFX j as as as 
SFX j as arum as 
SFX j as is as 
SFX j 0 que as 
SFX j 0 ne as 
SFX j 0 ve as 
SFX j as aque as 
SFX j as ane as 
SFX j as ave as 
SFX j as anque as 
SFX j as anne as 
SFX j as anve as 
SFX j as aeque as 
SFX j as aene as 
SFX j as aeve as 
SFX j as asque as 
SFX j as asne as 
SFX j as asve as 
SFX j as arumque as 
SFX j as arumne as 
SFX j as arumve as 
SFX j as isque as 
SFX j as isne as 
SFX j as isve as 
SFX j es es es 
SFX j es e es 
SFX j es en es 
SFX j es ae es 
SFX j es as es 
SFX j es arum es 
SFX j es is es 
SFX j 0 que es 
SFX j 0 ne es 
SFX j 0 ve es 
SFX j es esque es 
SFX j es esne es 
SFX j es esve es 
SFX j es eque es 
SFX j es ene es 
SFX j es eve es 
SFX j es enque es 
SFX j es enne es 
SFX j es enve es 
SFX j es aeque es 
SFX j es aene es 
SFX j es aeve es 
SFX j es asque es 
SFX j es asne es 
SFX j es asve es 
SFX j es arumque es 
SFX j es arumne es 
SFX j es arumve es 
SFX j es isque es 
SFX j es isne es 
SFX j es isve es 
SFX j e e e 
SFX j e en e 
SFX j e es e 
SFX j e ae e 
SFX j e as e 
SFX j e arum e 
SFX j e is e 
SFX j 0 que e 
SFX j 0 ne e 
SFX j 0 ve e 
SFX j e enque e 
SFX j e enne e 
SFX j e enve e 
SFX j e esque e 
SFX j e esne e 
SFX j e esve e 
SFX j e aeque e 
SFX j e aene e 
SFX j e aeve e 
SFX j e asque e 
SFX j e asne e 
SFX j e asve e 
SFX j e arumque e 
SFX j e arumne e 
SFX j e arumve e 
SFX j e isque e 
SFX j e isne e 
SFX j e isve e 
SFX q Y 3
SFX q 0 que . 
SFX q 0 ne . 
SFX q 0 ve . 
SFX r Y 220
SFX r us us [^i]us 
SFX r us ior [^i]us 
SFX r us iorem [^i]us 
SFX r us ioris [^i]us 
SFX r us iori [^i]us 
SFX r us iore [^i]us 
SFX r us ius [^i]us 
SFX r us iores [^i]us 
SFX r us iorum [^i]us 
SFX r us ioribus [^i]us 
SFX r us iora [^i]us 
SFX r 0 que [^i]us 
SFX r 0 ne [^i]us 
SFX r 0 ve [^i]us 
SFX r us iorque [^i]us 
SFX r us iorne [^i]us 
SFX r us iorve [^i]us 
SFX r us ioremque [^i]us 
SFX r us ioremne [^i]us 
SFX r us ioremve [^i]us 
SFX r us iorisque [^i]us 
SFX r us iorisne [^i]us 
SFX r us iorisve [^i]us 
SFX r us iorique [^i]us 
SFX r us iorine [^i]us 
SFX r us iorive [^i]us 
SFX r us ioreque [^i]us 
SFX r us iorene [^i]us 
SFX r us ioreve [^i]us 
SFX r us iusque [^i]us 
SFX r us iusne [^i]us 
SFX r us iusve [^i]us 
SFX r us ioresque [^i]us 
SFX r us ioresne [^i]us 
SFX r us ioresve [^i]us 
SFX r us iorumque [^i]us 
SFX r us iorumne [^i]us 
SFX r us iorumve [^i]us 
SFX r us ioribusque [^i]us 
SFX r us ioribusne [^i]us 
SFX r us ioribusve [^i]us 
SFX r us ioraque [^i]us 
SFX r us iorane [^i]us 
SFX r us iorave [^i]us 
SFX r us us ius 
SFX r us or ius 
SFX r us orem ius 
SFX r us oris ius 
SFX r us ori ius 
SFX r us ore ius 
SFX r us us ius 
SFX r us ores ius 
SFX r us orum ius 
SFX r us oribus ius 
SFX r us ora ius 
SFX r 0 que ius 
SFX r 0 ne ius 
SFX r 0 ve ius 
SFX r us orque ius 
SFX r us orne ius 
SFX r us orve ius 
SFX r us oremque ius 
SFX r us oremne ius 
SFX r us oremve ius 
SFX r us orisque ius 
SFX r us orisne ius 
SFX r us orisve ius 
SFX r us orique ius 
SFX r us orine ius 
SFX r us orive ius 
SFX r us oreque ius 
SFX r us orene ius 
SFX r us oreve ius 
SFX r us usque ius 
SFX r us usne ius 
SFX r us usve ius 
SFX r us oresque ius 
SFX r us oresne ius 
SFX r us oresve ius 
SFX r us orumque ius 
SFX r us orumne ius 
SFX r us orumve ius 
SFX r us oribusque ius 
SFX r us oribusne ius 
SFX r us oribusve ius 
SFX r us oraque ius 
SFX r us orane ius 
SFX r us orave ius 
SFX r i i i 
SFX r i ior i 
SFX r i iorem i 
SFX r i ioris i 
SFX r i iori i 
SFX r i iore i 
SFX r i ius i 
SFX r i iores i 
SFX r i iorum i 
SFX r i ioribus i 
SFX r i iora i 
SFX r 0 que i 
SFX r 0 ne i 
SFX r 0 ve i 
SFX r i iorque i 
SFX r i iorne i 
SFX r i iorve i 
SFX r i ioremque i 
SFX r i ioremne i 
SFX r i ioremve i 
SFX r i iorisque i 
SFX r i iorisne i 
SFX r i iorisve i 
SFX r i iorique i 
SFX r i iorine i 
SFX r i iorive i 
SFX r i ioreque i 
SFX r i iorene i 
SFX r i ioreve i 
SFX r i iusque i 
SFX r i iusne i 
SFX r i iusve i 
SFX r i ioresque i 
SFX r i ioresne i 
SFX r i ioresve i 
SFX r i iorumque i 
SFX r i iorumne i 
SFX r i iorumve i 
SFX r i ioribusque i 
SFX r i ioribusne i 
SFX r i ioribusve i 
SFX r i ioraque i 
SFX r i iorane i 
SFX r i iorave i 
SFX r is is is 
SFX r is ior is 
SFX r is iorem is 
SFX r is ioris is 
SFX r is iori is 
SFX r is iore is 
SFX r is ior is 
SFX r is ius is 
SFX r is iores is 
SFX r is iorum is 
SFX r is ioribus is 
SFX r is iora is 
SFX r 0 que is 
SFX r 0 ne is 
SFX r 0 ve is 
SFX r is iorque is 
SFX r is iorne is 
SFX r is iorve is 
SFX r is ioremque is 
SFX r is ioremne is 
SFX r is ioremve is 
SFX r is iorisque is 
SFX r is iorisne is 
SFX r is iorisve is 
SFX r is iorique is 
SFX r is iorine is 
SFX r is iorive is 
SFX r is ioreque is 
SFX r is iorene is 
SFX r is ioreve is 
SFX r is iorque is 
SFX r is iorne is 
SFX r is iorve is 
SFX r is iusque is 
SFX r is iusne is 
SFX r is iusve is 
SFX r is ioresque is 
SFX r is ioresne is 
SFX r is ioresve is 
SFX r is iorumque is 
SFX r is iorumne is 
SFX r is iorumve is 
SFX r is ioribusque is 
SFX r is ioribusne is 
SFX r is ioribusve is 
SFX r is ioraque is 
SFX r is iorane is 
SFX r is iorave is 
SFX r or or or 
SFX r or orem or 
SFX r or oris or 
SFX r or ori or 
SFX r or ore or 
SFX r or us or 
SFX r or ores or 
SFX r or orum or 
SFX r or oribus or 
SFX r or ora or 
SFX r 0 que or 
SFX r 0 ne or 
SFX r 0 ve or 
SFX r or oremque or 
SFX r or oremne or 
SFX r or oremve or 
SFX r or orisque or 
SFX r or orisne or 
SFX r or orisve or 
SFX r or orique or 
SFX r or orine or 
SFX r or orive or 
SFX r or oreque or 
SFX r or orene or 
SFX r or oreve or 
SFX r or usque or 
SFX r or usne or 
SFX r or usve or 
SFX r or oresque or 
SFX r or oresne or 
SFX r or oresve or 
SFX r or orumque or 
SFX r or orumne or 
SFX r or orumve or 
SFX r or oribusque or 
SFX r or oribusne or 
SFX r or oribusve or 
SFX r or oraque or 
SFX r or orane or 
SFX r or orave or 
