src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
abscisio/q
absolubilis/fg
abundus/abcr
accentus/h
accessus/h
acies/i
acris/fgrst
adeant/q
adeundum/q
adieras/q
adiverimus/q
adolescentis/fg
adsunto/q
aequidistantis/fg
aestivalis/fg
aestus/h
afferebamur/q
afferremur/q
agilis/fgrst
aio/q
altero/Bq
ambitus/h
anfractus/h
angustus/abcrs
animantis/fg
antipodum/q
apotome/j
aptus/abcrs
Ascalonitas/q
ascensionalis/fg
aspectus/h
auferemur/q
auferri/q
australis/fg
avidus/abcr
bilibris/fg
binomialis/fg
bissextilis/fg
boatus/h
brevis/fgrst
caecus/abcr
calamitas/q
calefio/q
cardinalis/fg
casus/h
celebris/fg
celo/q
census/h
certus/abcrs
circuitus/abch
circumferas/q
circumferentis/fg
circumferimus/q
citus/abcrs
clima/q
coelestis/fg
coetus/h
coierant/q
coivititis/q
columnaris/fg
cometes/j
communis/fgrst
complexus/Sh
concentus/h
concessibilis/fg
concinnus/abcrs
concursus/h
conferebat/q
conformis/fgr
congeries/i
conglobatus/abcrs
congressus/Sh
conoidalis/fg
consultus/abcrs
contactus/h
contextus/h
continens/q
continentis/fg
contractus/h
convexus/abcrs
cornu/h
correctus/abcrs
corruptibilis/fg
crassities/i
crebri/abcr
cremonensis/fg
currus/h
curtus/abcrs
debilis/fgr
decentis/fgs
deeritis/q
deferentis/fg
deferremur/q
delectabilis/fg
densus/abcrs
deterior/r
diametralis/fgt
dies/i
differam/q
differuntur/q
difficilis/fgrt
digressus/Sh
directus/abcr
dissimilis/fg
diversus/abcr
dominicalis/fg
domus/bh
duplicis/fg
durities/i
earum/q
eccessus/h
effectus/h
efferemus/q
efficacis/fgrs
effigies/i
egressus/Sh
enormis/fg
eorumdem/q
epitome/j
erratus/h
exactus/abcrs
excessus/h
exeam/q
exilis/fgr
eximus/q
exitialis/fg
expressus/abcr
exterior/r
facies/i
fallacis/fg
falsus/abcrs
felicis/fgrt
felicitas/q
fertis/q
fidelis/fgt
fides/i
flatus/h
fluctus/h
fortis/fgrs
fructuosus/abcr
futurus/abcq
generalis/fgrst
genu/h
glacies/i
gracilis/fgrs
gradus/h
grandis/fgr
grossus/abcrs
hexagonalis/fg
hiatus/h
hinnitus/h
hypate/j
hyperbole/j
ibant/q
ictus/h
illud/q
illustris/fgrst
immoderatus/abcrs
immunis/fg
impetus/h
imprudentis/fgrs
inclinatus/abcrs
incomprehensibilis/fg
ineffabilis/fgt
inessent/q
inextricabilis/fg
infero/q
ingeniosus/abcrs
ingressus/Sh
iniissent/q
insaturabilis/fg
institutio/q
intellectus/h
intentus/abcr
interibas/q
interivero/q
intuitus/Sh
inutilis/fgrst
i/q
irregularis/fg
isagoge/j
lacu/q
languidus/abcrs
lateralis/fgt
lentus/abcrs
liberalis/fg
longus/abcrs
luminosus/abcrs
lunaris/fg
luxus/h
magistratus/h
magnes/q
manifestus/abcrs
manus/h
materies/i
meatus/h
mediocris/fgt
melior/r
meminerat/q
meridies/i
mese/j
messanensis/fg
minor/qr
mitis/fgr
mobilis/fg
modestus/abcrs
mollis/fgrt
mollities/i
motus/h
multicoloris/fg
musice/j
natalis/fg
navigatio/q
nequiret/q
nete/j
netus/i
nexus/h
nobilis/fgrs
nominabilis/fg
nosmet/q
notus/abcrs
nutus/h
obeuntibus/q
obitur/q
obliquus/abcrs
obscurus/abcrs
obtutus/h
occasus/h
occidentalis/fg
occursus/h
offerebam/q
oportuerat/q
opportunus/abcrs
orientis/fg
ortus/Sh
paramese/j
paranete/j
parhypate/j
paris/fg
pastoralis/fg
paucus/abcrs
perangustus/abcr
percussio/q
perfert/q
peritus/Sabcrs
perpendicularis/fgt
perspicacius/abcr
pertransitu/q
planicies/i
planities/i
plenus/abcr
pluvialis/fg
porismatorum/q
porticus/h
portus/h
potentis/fgrs
praeclarus/abcrs
praeestis/q
praeterierimus/q
praevalentis/fg
praxis/q
prior/r
prodibant/q
prodivititis/q
profertis/q
profundus/abcrs
progressus/Sh
propinquus/abcrs
proprius/abcr
prudentis/fgrs
pulchri/abcr
pulsus/h
qualis/fg
quamplurimos/q
quietus/abcr
quiissem/q
quivissetis/q
recentis/fgrs
receptus/h
recessus/h
rediens/q
redivitierunt/q
referri/q
refertus/abcr
remotus/abcrs
res/i
rivalis/fg
rubicundus/abcrs
sagacitas/q
saltus/h
sapientis/fgr
saturabilis/fg
segnis/fgr
seipsa/q
sensilis/fg
sensus/h
serratilis/g
sexies/q
simplicis/fgrst
singularis/fg
sinus/h
situs/abch
species/i
specularis/fg
spes/i
spiritus/h
spissus/abcr
strepitus/h
suavis/fgrst
subeamus/q
subferebatis/q
subieramus/q
subivitis/q
subtilis/fgrst
superficies/i
superfuturum/q
tabularis/fg
tactus/h
tardus/abcrs
temperies/i
tener/abcrs
terrestris/fg
Thebarum/q
tonitrus/h
tractatus/h
transferatur/q
transibit/q
transparentis/fg
trecentarum/q
triplicitas/q
triremis/fg
tumultus/h
tutus/abcrs
umbrosus/abcr
unimembris/fg
usus/Sh
utrum/q
valentis/fgrs
vehementis/fgrs
veracis/fgrs
versus/h
verticalis/fg
vetustus/abcrs
virtus/q
visus/abch
vocalis/fg
